test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AS_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dándas - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AS_STEM_1

     dándas+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: dándas
     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas
     dándas+V+RELATIVE: dándass
     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dándasäsaa
     dándas+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dándasäs
     dándas+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dándasäsaang
     dándas+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dándasäsga
     dándas+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dándasäsaas
     dándas+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dándasäsaa.ang
     dándas+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándas'uuj
     dándas+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'uujang
     dándas+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dándasäsaa'uujang
     dándas+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dándas'us
     dándas+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándas'ujaa
     dándas+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'uujaangaa
     dándas+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dándasäsaa'us
     dándas+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dándasäsaa'ahlans
     dándas+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dándasäseehl
     dándas+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: dándas'uu
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándas'waa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'waa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'waang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: dándas'wägan
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándas'aawaa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: dándas'aawaan
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: dándas'waas
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dándas'aawaas
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'waa.ang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'aawaa.ang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'wägiinii
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'wägaangaa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'wägaangaan
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dándas'waaäsaa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dándas'waaäs
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dándas'waaäsaang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dándas'waaäsga
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dándas'waaäsaas
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'waaäsaa.ang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándas'waa'uuj
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'waa'uujang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dándas'waaäsaa'uujang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dándas'waa'us
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándas'waa'ujaa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'waa'uujaangaa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dándas'waaäsaa'us
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dándas'waa'ahlanggang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: dándas'waa'ahlanggan
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'waa'ahlanggiinii
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dándas'waaäsaa'ahlans
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dándas'waa'ahlans
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: dándas'aawaa'ahlang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dándas'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dándas'aawaa'ahlanggang
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: dándas'waa'ahl
     dándas+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dándas'waaäseehl
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: dándas'ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándas'angga
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'anggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: dándas'anggan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándas'aangaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: dándas'aangaan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: dándas'ans
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dándas'aangaas
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'angang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'aangaa.ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: dándas'anggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'anggiinii
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'anggaangaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'anggaangaan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dándas'angäsaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dándas'angäs
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dándas'angäsaang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dándas'angäsga
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dándas'angäsaas
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'angäsaa.ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'uuj
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'uujang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dándas'angäsaa'uujang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'us
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándas'ang'ujaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'ang'uujaangaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dándas'angäsaa'us
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dándas'aang'ahlanggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: dándas'aang'ahlanggan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'aang'ahlanggiinii
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dándas'angäsaa'ahlans
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dándas'aang'ahlans
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: dándas'aangaa'ahlang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dándas'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dándas'aangaa'ahlanggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: dándas'aang'ahl
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dándas'angäseehl
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: dándas'ang'uu
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'waa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'waa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'waang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: dándas'ang'wägan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándas'ang'aawaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: dándas'ang'aawaan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: dándas'ang'waas
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: dándas'ang'aawaas
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'ang'waa.ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'ang'aawaa.ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'ang'wägiinii
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'ang'wägaangaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'ang'wägaangaan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: dándas'ang'waaäsaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: dándas'ang'waaäs
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: dándas'ang'waaäsaang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: dándas'ang'waaäsga
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: dándas'ang'waaäsaas
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: dándas'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: dándas'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'waa'uuj
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'waa'uujang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: dándas'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: dándas'ang'waa'us
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: dándas'ang'waa'ujaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: dándas'ang'waaäsaa'us
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: dándas'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: dándas'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: dándas'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: dándas'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: dándas'ang'waa'ahlans
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: dándas'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: dándas'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: dándas'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: dándas'ang'waa'ahl
     dándas+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: dándas'ang'waaäseehl
